src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3821 N 1
SFX 3821 ōc ogōncōm .
SFX 3822 N 1
SFX 3822 ōc ogōnc .
SFX 3823 N 1
SFX 3823 ōc ogōncych .
SFX 3824 N 1
SFX 3824 ōc ogōncyj .
SFX 3825 N 1
SFX 3825 ōc ogōncymi .
SFX 3826 N 1
SFX 3826 ōc ogōncymu .
SFX 3827 N 1
SFX 3827 ōc ogōncym .
SFX 3828 N 1
SFX 3828 ōc ogōncy .
SFX 3829 N 1
SFX 3829 ōj oja .
SFX 3830 N 1
SFX 3830 ōj ojich .
SFX 3831 N 1
SFX 3831 ōj ojigo .
SFX 3832 N 1
SFX 3832 ōj ojij .
SFX 3833 N 1
SFX 3833 ōj ojimi .
SFX 3834 N 1
SFX 3834 ōj ojimu .
SFX 3835 N 1
SFX 3835 ōj ojim .
SFX 3836 N 1
SFX 3836 ōj oji .
SFX 3837 N 1
SFX 3837 y zyjsi .
SFX 3838 N 1
SFX 3838 y zyjszego .
SFX 3839 N 1
SFX 3839 y zyjsze .
SFX 3840 N 1
SFX 3840 y zyjszo .
SFX 3841 N 1
SFX 3841 y zyjszōm .
SFX 3842 N 1
SFX 3842 y zyjszych .
SFX 3843 N 1
SFX 3843 y zyjszyj .
SFX 3844 N 1
SFX 3844 y zyjszymi .
SFX 3845 N 1
SFX 3845 y zyjszymu .
SFX 3846 N 1
SFX 3846 y zyjszym .
SFX 3847 N 1
SFX 3847 y zyjszy .
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 y zyjsi .
PFX 3848 Y 1
PFX 3848 0 noj .
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 y zyjszego .
PFX 3849 Y 1
PFX 3849 0 noj .
SFX 3850 Y 1
SFX 3850 y zyjsze .
PFX 3850 Y 1
PFX 3850 0 noj .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 y zyjszo .
PFX 3851 Y 1
PFX 3851 0 noj .
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 y zyjszōm .
PFX 3852 Y 1
PFX 3852 0 noj .
SFX 3853 Y 1
SFX 3853 y zyjszych .
PFX 3853 Y 1
PFX 3853 0 noj .
SFX 3854 Y 1
SFX 3854 y zyjszyj .
PFX 3854 Y 1
PFX 3854 0 noj .
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 y zyjszymi .
PFX 3855 Y 1
PFX 3855 0 noj .
SFX 3856 Y 1
SFX 3856 y zyjszymu .
PFX 3856 Y 1
PFX 3856 0 noj .
SFX 3857 Y 1
SFX 3857 y zyjszym .
PFX 3857 Y 1
PFX 3857 0 noj .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 y zyjszy .
PFX 3858 Y 1
PFX 3858 0 noj .
SFX 3859 N 1
SFX 3859 ōz ozach .
SFX 3860 N 1
SFX 3860 ōz ozami .
SFX 3861 N 1
SFX 3861 ōz ozie .
SFX 3862 N 1
SFX 3862 ōz ozowi .
SFX 3863 N 1
SFX 3863 ōz ozōm .
SFX 3864 N 1
SFX 3864 ōz ozōw .
SFX 3865 N 1
SFX 3865 ōz ozu .
SFX 3866 N 1
SFX 3866 ōz ozym .
SFX 3867 N 1
SFX 3867 ōz ozy .
SFX 3868 N 1
SFX 3868 ieć za .
SFX 3869 N 1
SFX 3869 ieć zōm .
SFX 3870 N 1
SFX 3870 ieć zōncego .
SFX 3871 N 1
SFX 3871 ieć zōnce .
SFX 3872 N 1
SFX 3872 ieć zōnco .
SFX 3873 N 1
SFX 3873 ieć zōncōm .
SFX 3874 N 1
SFX 3874 ieć zōnc .
SFX 3875 N 1
SFX 3875 ieć zōncych .
SFX 3876 N 1
SFX 3876 ieć zōncyj .
SFX 3877 N 1
SFX 3877 ieć zōncymi .
SFX 3878 N 1
SFX 3878 ieć zōncymu .
SFX 3879 N 1
SFX 3879 ieć zōncym .
SFX 3880 N 1
SFX 3880 ieć zōncy .
SFX 3881 N 1
SFX 3881 ieć zymy .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 li .
PFX 3882 Y 1
PFX 3882 m b .
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 0 ły .
PFX 3883 Y 1
PFX 3883 m b .
SFX 3884 N 1
SFX 3884 zec cy .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 y 0 .
PFX 3885 Y 1
PFX 3885 0 sō .
SFX 3886 N 1
SFX 3886 ciōńć tnieocie .
SFX 3887 N 1
SFX 3887 ciōńć etna .
SFX 3888 N 1
SFX 3888 ciōńć etnieocie .
SFX 3889 N 1
SFX 3889 ciōńć etnieosz .
SFX 3890 N 1
SFX 3890 ciōńć etnieo .
SFX 3891 N 1
SFX 3891 ciōńć etnieōmy .
SFX 3892 N 1
SFX 3892 ciōńć etnijcie .
SFX 3893 N 1
SFX 3893 ciōńć etnijmy .
SFX 3894 N 1
SFX 3894 ciōńć etnij .
SFX 3895 N 1
SFX 3895 ciōńć etnōm .
SFX 3896 N 1
SFX 3896 ejść szołbych .
SFX 3897 N 1
SFX 3897 ejść szołbyś .
SFX 3898 N 1
SFX 3898 ejść szołby .
SFX 3899 N 1
SFX 3899 ejść szołch .
SFX 3900 N 1
SFX 3900 ejść szołech .
SFX 3901 N 1
SFX 3901 ejść szołś .
SFX 3902 N 1
SFX 3902 ejść szoł .
SFX 3903 N 1
SFX 3903 ejś szołch .
SFX 3904 N 1
SFX 3904 ejś szołech .
SFX 3905 N 1
SFX 3905 ejś szołś .
SFX 3906 N 1
SFX 3906 ejś szoł .
SFX 3907 N 1
SFX 3907 yźć azłabych .
SFX 3908 N 1
SFX 3908 yźć azłabyś .
SFX 3909 N 1
SFX 3909 yźć azłaby .
SFX 3910 N 1
SFX 3910 yźć azłach .
SFX 3911 N 1
SFX 3911 yźć azłaś .
SFX 3912 N 1
SFX 3912 yźć azła .
SFX 3913 N 1
SFX 3913 yźć azłoby .
SFX 3914 N 1
SFX 3914 yźć azło .
SFX 3915 N 1
SFX 3915 yźć azłybymy .
SFX 3916 N 1
SFX 3916 yźć azłybyście .
SFX 3917 N 1
SFX 3917 yźć azłyby .
SFX 3918 N 1
SFX 3918 yźć azłychmy .
SFX 3919 N 1
SFX 3919 yźć azłymy .
SFX 3920 N 1
SFX 3920 yźć azłyście .
SFX 3921 N 1
SFX 3921 yźć azły .
SFX 3922 N 1
SFX 3922 yź azłach .
SFX 3923 N 1
SFX 3923 yź azłaś .
SFX 3924 N 1
SFX 3924 yź azła .
SFX 3925 N 1
SFX 3925 yź azło .
SFX 3926 N 1
SFX 3926 yź azłychmy .
SFX 3927 N 1
SFX 3927 yź azłyście .
SFX 3928 N 1
SFX 3928 yź azły .
SFX 3929 N 1
SFX 3929 azd eździe .
SFX 3930 N 1
SFX 3930 ozd azdach .
SFX 3931 N 1
SFX 3931 ozd azdami .
SFX 3932 N 1
SFX 3932 ozd azdowi .
SFX 3933 N 1
SFX 3933 ozd azdōm .
SFX 3934 N 1
SFX 3934 ozd azdōw .
SFX 3935 N 1
SFX 3935 ozd azdu .
SFX 3936 N 1
SFX 3936 ozd azd .
SFX 3937 N 1
SFX 3937 ozd azdym .
SFX 3938 N 1
SFX 3938 ozd azdy .
SFX 3939 N 1
SFX 3939 ozd eździe .
SFX 3940 N 1
SFX 3940 ōńć ma .
SFX 3941 N 1
SFX 3941 ōńć miecie .
SFX 3942 N 1
SFX 3942 ōńć miesz .
SFX 3943 N 1
SFX 3943 ōńć mie .
SFX 3944 N 1
SFX 3944 ōńć mijcie .
SFX 3945 N 1
SFX 3945 ōńć mijmy .
SFX 3946 N 1
SFX 3946 ōńć mij .
SFX 3947 N 1
SFX 3947 ōńć miōm .
SFX 3948 N 1
SFX 3948 ōńć miymy .
SFX 3949 N 1
SFX 3949 rzić arciach .
SFX 3950 N 1
SFX 3950 rzić arciami .
SFX 3951 N 1
SFX 3951 rzić arcia .
SFX 3952 N 1
SFX 3952 rzić arcie .
SFX 3953 N 1
SFX 3953 rzić arcio .
SFX 3954 N 1
SFX 3954 rzić arciōm .
SFX 3955 N 1
SFX 3955 rzić arciu .
SFX 3956 N 1
SFX 3956 rzić arci .
SFX 3957 N 1
SFX 3957 rzić arciym .
SFX 3958 N 1
SFX 3958 rzić arć .
SFX 3959 N 1
SFX 3959 rzić arlichmy .
SFX 3960 N 1
SFX 3960 rzić arliście .
SFX 3961 N 1
SFX 3961 rzić arli .
SFX 3962 N 1
SFX 3962 rzić arłach .
SFX 3963 N 1
SFX 3963 rzić arłaś .
SFX 3964 N 1
SFX 3964 rzić arła .
SFX 3965 N 1
SFX 3965 rzić arłech .
SFX 3966 N 1
SFX 3966 rzić arłeś .
SFX 3967 N 1
SFX 3967 rzić arło .
SFX 3968 N 1
SFX 3968 rzić arłychmy .
SFX 3969 N 1
SFX 3969 rzić arłyście .
SFX 3970 N 1
SFX 3970 rzić arły .
SFX 3971 N 1
SFX 3971 rzić artego .
SFX 3972 N 1
SFX 3972 rzić arte .
SFX 3973 N 1
SFX 3973 rzić arto .
SFX 3974 N 1
SFX 3974 rzić artōm .
SFX 3975 N 1
SFX 3975 rzić artych .
SFX 3976 N 1
SFX 3976 rzić artyj .
SFX 3977 N 1
SFX 3977 rzić artymi .
SFX 3978 N 1
SFX 3978 rzić artymu .
SFX 3979 N 1
SFX 3979 rzić artym .
SFX 3980 N 1
SFX 3980 rzić arty .
SFX 3981 N 1
SFX 3981 rzić ar .
SFX 3982 N 1
SFX 3982 ojić jōno .
SFX 3983 N 1
SFX 3983 jść dbych .
SFX 3984 N 1
SFX 3984 jść dbyś .
SFX 3985 N 1
SFX 3985 jść dby .
SFX 3986 N 1
SFX 3986 jść dlibymy .
SFX 3987 N 1
SFX 3987 jść dlibyście .
SFX 3988 N 1
SFX 3988 jść dliby .
SFX 3989 N 1
SFX 3989 jść dlichmy .
SFX 3990 N 1
SFX 3990 jść dlimy .
SFX 3991 N 1
SFX 3991 jść dliście .
SFX 3992 N 1
SFX 3992 jść dli .
SFX 3993 N 1
SFX 3993 jść dłabych .
SFX 3994 N 1
SFX 3994 jść dłabyś .
SFX 3995 N 1
SFX 3995 jść dłaby .
SFX 3996 N 1
SFX 3996 jść dłach .
SFX 3997 N 1
SFX 3997 jść dłaś .
SFX 3998 N 1
SFX 3998 jść dła .
SFX 3999 N 1
SFX 3999 jść dłech .
SFX 4000 N 1
SFX 4000 jść dłeś .
SFX 4001 N 1
SFX 4001 jść dłoby .
SFX 4002 N 1
SFX 4002 jść dło .
SFX 4003 N 1
SFX 4003 jść dłybymy .
SFX 4004 N 1
SFX 4004 jść dłybyście .
SFX 4005 N 1
SFX 4005 jść dłyby .
SFX 4006 N 1
SFX 4006 jść dłychmy .
SFX 4007 N 1
SFX 4007 jść dłymy .
SFX 4008 N 1
SFX 4008 jść dłyście .
SFX 4009 N 1
SFX 4009 jść dły .
SFX 4010 N 1
SFX 4010 jść dniynci .
SFX 4011 N 1
SFX 4011 jść dniyntego .
SFX 4012 N 1
SFX 4012 jść dniynte .
SFX 4013 N 1
SFX 4013 jść dniynto .
SFX 4014 N 1
SFX 4014 jść dniyntōm .
SFX 4015 N 1
SFX 4015 jść dniyntych .
SFX 4016 N 1
SFX 4016 jść dniyntyj .
SFX 4017 N 1
SFX 4017 jść dniyntymi .
SFX 4018 N 1
SFX 4018 jść dniyntymu .
SFX 4019 N 1
SFX 4019 jść dniyntym .
SFX 4020 N 1
SFX 4020 jść dniynty .
SFX 4021 N 1
SFX 4021 jść dniyńciach .
SFX 4022 N 1
SFX 4022 jść dniyńciami .
SFX 4023 N 1
SFX 4023 jść dniyńcia .
SFX 4024 N 1
SFX 4024 jść dniyńcie .
SFX 4025 N 1
SFX 4025 jść dniyńcio .
SFX 4026 N 1
SFX 4026 jść dniyńciōm .
SFX 4027 N 1
SFX 4027 jść dniyńciu .
SFX 4028 N 1
SFX 4028 jść dniyńciym .
SFX 4029 N 1
SFX 4029 jść dniyńć .
SFX 4030 N 1
SFX 4030 jść d .
SFX 4031 N 1
SFX 4031 ojś aleziōnego .
SFX 4032 N 1
SFX 4032 ojś aleziōne .
SFX 4033 N 1
SFX 4033 ojś aleziōno .
SFX 4034 N 1
SFX 4034 ojś aleziōnōm .
SFX 4035 N 1
SFX 4035 ojś aleziōnych .
SFX 4036 N 1
SFX 4036 ojś aleziōnyj .
SFX 4037 N 1
SFX 4037 ojś aleziōnymi .
