src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
mrōz/3859,3860,3861,3862,3863,3864,3865,3866,3867
my/3882,3883,3885
mōc/2190,3796,3797,3798,3799,3800,3801,3802,3803,3804,3805,3806,3807,3808,3809,3810,3811,3812,3813,3814,3815,3816,3817,2191,3818,3819,3820,3821,3822,3823,3824,3825,3826,3827,3828,2192,2193,2194,2195,2196,2197,2198,2223
najazd/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,3929
nowōz/3859,3860,3861,3862,3863,3864,3865,3866,3867
powrōz/3859,3860,4375,3861,3862,3863,3864,3866,3867
przijōńć/3940,3941,3942,3943,3944,3945,3946,3947,3948,954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803
rozciōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,3887,3888,3889,3890,3891,3892,3893,3894,3895
swōj/3829,891,3830,3831,3832,3833,3834,3835,3836,893
twōj/3829,891,3830,3831,3832,3833,3834,3835,3836,893
uzbrojić/3982,744,279,287,288,928,929,930,931,932,933,934,745,757,758,759,760,761,762,763,764,765,766,1227,1228,1229,1230,1231,1232,1233,1234,1235,1236,1237,1238,1239,1240,1241,1242,1243,1244,1245,1246,1247,1248,767,768,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,776,777,2044,2045,2046
wisieć/489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,506,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,989,527,3868,3869,3870,3871,3872,3873,3874,3875,3876,3877,3878,3879,3880,5369,5370,5371,5372,5373,5374,5375,5376,5377,3881,5378,5379,5380
wkludzieć/3881
wyciōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,5277,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,1804,3886,1806,1807,1808,1809,1810,1811,1812
wyjozd/3930,3931,3932,3933,3934,3935,3936,3937,3938,3939,1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9
wystry/3848,3849,3850,3851,3852,3853,3854,3855,3856,3857,3858,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,719,3837,3838,3839,3840,3841,3842,3843,3844,3845,3846,3847
wōz/3859,3860,4375,3861,3862,3863,3864,3866,3867
zalyź/3922,3923,3924,3925,3926,3927,3928,2701,2702,2707,3168,2708,2709,2710,2711,2712,2713,2714,2715,2716,2717,2718,2719,2720,3169,3170,3171,3172,3173,3174,3175,2721,3176,3177,3190,3203,1412,1818,1819,1009,1013
zalyźć/3907,3908,3909,3910,3911,3912,3913,3914,3915,3916,3917,3918,3919,3920,3921,2640,2641,2656,2657,2667,3117,2668,2669,2670,2671,2672,2673,2674,2675,2676,2677,2678,2679,2680,3121,3122,3123,3124,3125,3126,3127,2681,3128,3129,3154,3167,279,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,395,288
znojś/4031,4032,4033,4034,4035,4036,4037,4038,4039,4040,4041,4042,4043,4044,4045,4046,4047,4048,4049,4050,4051,4052,4053,4054,4055,4056,4057,4058,4059,4060,4061,4062,4063,2085,2086,2087,2088,2089,2090,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,2091,2092,2093
ôdciōńć/954,955,956,957,958,959,960,961,962,963,964,965,966,967,968,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,1784,1785,1786,1787,1788,1789,1790,1791,1792,1793,1794,1795,1796,1797,1798,1799,1800,1801,1802,1803,3887,3888,3889,3890,3891,3892,3893,3894,3895
ôdejś/2085,2086,2087,2088,2089,2090,2091,2092,2093,2094,2095,2096,1412,2097,2098,2099,2100,2101,2102,2103,2104,2105,2106,2107,2108,2109,2110,2111,3903,3904,3905,3906
ôdejść/2047,2048,2049,2050,2051,2052,2053,2054,2055,111,112,554,279,555,113,556,557,2056,2057,2058,2059,2060,2061,2062,2063,2064,2065,2066,2067,2068,2069,2070,2071,2072,2073,2074,2075,2076,2077,3896,3897,3898,3899,3900,3901,3902
ôdjazd/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,3929
ôdnojść/3983,3984,3985,3986,3987,3988,3989,3990,3991,3992,3993,3994,3995,3996,3997,3998,3999,4000,4001,4002,4003,4004,4005,4006,4007,4008,4009,4010,4011,4012,4013,4014,4015,4016,4017,4018,4019,4020,4021,4022,4023,4024,4025,4026,4027,4028,4029,4030,2047,2048,2049,2050,2051,2052,2053,2054,2055
ôstry/3848,3849,3850,3851,3852,3853,3854,3855,3856,3857,3858,115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,3837,3838,3839,3840,3841,3842,3843,3844,3845,3846,3847
